District of Columbia statutes.
16-1031

Arrests.

(a)

A law enforcement officer shall arrest a person if the law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the person:

(1)

Committed an intrafamily offense that resulted in physical injury, including physical pain or illness, regardless of whether or not the intrafamily offense was committed in the presence of the law enforcement officer; or

(2)

Committed an intrafamily offense that caused or was intended to cause reasonable fear of imminent serious physical injury or death.

(b)

The law enforcement officer shall present the person arrested under subsection (a) of this section to the United States Attorney for charging.

Apr. 30, 1991, D.C. Law 8-261, § 2(c)(2), 37 DCR 5001
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-368, § 4(g), 56 DCR 1338
Arrests without warrant by law enforcement officers, see § 23-581.
This section is referenced in § 23-581.
1981 Ed., § 16-1031.
D.C. Law 17-368, in subsec. (b), deleted “under section 16-1002” following “charging”.